Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Buffer strips help to reduce the levels of sediment, crop nutrient, pesticides, and other chemicals introduced into surface water resources; and

(2) Both wildlife and people benefit as a result of improved water quality.

Laws 1998, LB 1126, § 2.